Utah statutes.
59-13-202.   Refund of tax for agricultural uses on individual income and
corporate franchise and income tax returns -- Application for permit for
refund -- Division of Finance to pay claims -- Rules permitted to enforce part
-- Penalties.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a) (i)  Except at provided in Subsection (1)(a)(ii), "claimant" means a
resident or nonresident person.
(ii)  "Claimant" does not include an estate or trust.
(b)  "Estate" means a nonresident estate or a resident estate.
(c)  "Refundable tax credit" or "tax credit" means a tax credit that a
claimant, estate, or trust may claim:
(i)  as provided by statute; and
(ii)  regardless of whether, for the taxable year for which the claimant,
estate, or trust claims the tax credit, the claimant, estate, or trust has a
tax liability under:
(A)  Chapter 7, Corporate Franchise and Income Taxes; or
(B)  Chapter 10, Individual Income Tax Act.
(d)  "Trust" means a nonresident trust or a resident trust.
(2)  Any claimant, estate, or trust that purchases and uses any motor fuel
within the state for the purpose of operating or propelling stationary farm
engines and self-propelled farm machinery used for nonhighway agricultural
uses, and that has paid the tax on the motor fuel as provided by this part, is
entitled to a refund of the tax subject to the conditions and limitations
provided under this part.
(3) (a)  A claimant, estate, or trust desiring a nonhighway agricultural use
refund under this part shall claim the refund as a refundable tax credit on
the tax return the claimant, estate, or trust files under:
(i)  Chapter 7, Corporate Franchise and Income Taxes; or
(ii)  Chapter 10, Individual Income Tax Act.
(b)  A claimant, estate, or trust not subject to filing a tax return described
in Subsection (3)(a) shall obtain a permit and file claims on a calendar year
basis.
(c)  Any claimant, estate, or trust claiming a refundable tax credit under
this section is required to furnish any or all of the information outlined in
this section upon request of the commission.
(d)  A refundable tax credit under this section is allowed only on purchases
on which tax is paid during the taxable year covered by the tax return.
(4)  In order to obtain a permit for a refund of motor fuel tax paid, an
application shall be filed containing:
(a)  the name of the claimant, estate, or trust;
(b)  the claimant's, estate's, or trust's address;
(c)  location and number of acres owned and operated, location and number of
acres rented and operated, the latter of which shall be verified by a signed
statement from the legal owner;
(d)  number of acres planted to each crop, type of soil, and whether irrigated
or dry; and
(e)  make, size, type of fuel used, and power rating of each piece of
equipment using fuel.  If the claimant, estate, or trust is an operator of
self-propelled or tractor-pulled farm machinery with which the claimant,
estate, or trust works for hire doing custom jobs for other farmers, the
application shall include information the commission requires and shall all be
contained in, and be considered part of, the original application.  The
claimant, estate, or trust shall also file with the application a certificate
from the county assessor showing each piece of equipment using fuel.  This
original application and all information contained in it constitutes a
permanent file with the commission in the name of the claimant, estate, or
trust.
(5)  Any claimant, estate, or trust claiming the right to a refund of motor
fuel tax paid shall file a claim with the commission by April 15 of each year
for the refund for the previous calendar year.  The claim shall state the name
and address of the claimant, estate, or trust, the number of gallons of motor
fuel purchased for nonhighway agricultural uses, and the amount paid for the
motor fuel.  The claimant, estate, or trust shall retain the original invoice
to support the claim.  No more than one claim for a tax refund may be filed
annually by each user of motor fuel purchased for nonhighway agricultural
uses.
(6)  Upon commission approval of the claim for a refund, the Division of
Finance shall pay the amount found due to the claimant, estate, or trust.  The
total amount of claims for refunds shall be paid from motor fuel taxes.
(7)  The commission may promulgate rules to enforce this part, and may refuse
to accept as evidence of purchase or payment any instruments which show
alteration or which fail to indicate the quantity of the purchase, the price
of the motor fuel, a statement that it is purchased for purposes other than
transportation, and the date of purchase and delivery.  If the commission is
not satisfied with the evidence submitted in connection with the claim, it may
reject the claim or require additional evidence.
(8)  Any claimant, estate, or trust aggrieved by the decision of the
commission with respect to a refundable tax credit or refund may file a
request for agency action, requesting a hearing before the commission.
(9)  Any claimant, estate, or trust that makes any false claim, report, or
statement, as claimant, estate, trust, agent, or creditor, with intent to
defraud or secure a refund to which the claimant, estate, or trust is not
entitled, is subject to the criminal penalties provided under Section
59-1-401, and the commission shall initiate the filing of a complaint for
alleged violations of this part.  In addition to these penalties, the
claimant, estate, or trust may not receive any refund as a claimant, estate,
or trust or as a creditor of a claimant, estate, or trust for refund for a
period of five years.
(10)  Refunds to which a claimant, estate, or trust is entitled under this
part shall be paid from the Transportation Fund.
